Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3404
Budget limitation; approval; effect.

When a budget limitation is approved by the voters at a general, primary, or special election held for such purpose, the budget for the years in which taxes will be levied to fund such budget shall, except as provided in section 13-511, be limited as provided in the petition.

Laws 1978, Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 17, § 2.